Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3216
Transitional provision.

The Uniform Special Deposits Act applies to:

(1) a special deposit made under an account agreement executed on or after September 3, 2025; and

(2) a deposit made under an agreement executed before September 3, 2025, if:

(A) all parties entitled to amend the agreement agree to make the deposit a special deposit governed by the act; and

(B) the special deposit referenced in the amended agreement satisfies section 8-3205.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 16.